Tennessee statutes. Title 34 Guardianship
Chapter 3

Conservatorship Generally

34-3-101. Action for appointment of conservator — Where brought.

Actions for the appointment of a conservator may be brought in a court exercising probate jurisdiction or any other court of record of any county in which there is venue.

An action for the appointment of a conservator shall be brought in the county of residence of the alleged person with a disability.

Nothing in this title shall be construed to supersede the Tennessee Adult Protection Act, compiled in title 71, chapter 6, part 1, or the orders of the court pursuant to such act.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 41; T.C.A. §34-13-101; Acts 2013, ch. 435, §§ 1, 46.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§34-3-101 —34-3-120,34-3-201 —34-3-227,34-3-301 —34-3-304,34-3-401 —34-3-413 (Code 1858, §§ 2506, 2508-2515, § 2516 (deriv. Acts 1789, ch. 39, § 5), § 2517, § 2518 (deriv. Acts 1789, ch. 39, § 5), 2519, 2520, 2521 (deriv. Acts 1762, ch. 5, §§ 3, 10-13, 15-17), § 2521 (deriv. Acts 1762, ch. 5, §§ 4, 9, 15, 16; 1831, ch. 29, § 1; 1841-1842, ch. 117, § 1; 1853-1854, ch. 53, § 6), § 2522 (deriv. Acts 1762, ch. 5, § 24), §§ 2523-2532 (deriv. Acts 1762, ch. 5, §§ 9, 15, 18, 19; 1831, ch. 30, §§ 1, 2; 1841-1842, ch. 24, § 5; 1841-1842, ch. 117, §§ 1, 2), §§ 2533-2543 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 6, § 1; 1843-1844, ch. 122, §§ 1, 2; 1849-1850, ch. 27, §§ 1, 2; 1849-1850, ch. 34, §§ 1-3; 1851-1852, ch. 141, § 7; 1851-1852, ch. 149, §§ 1-4, 6);§§ 2544, 2545 (deriv. Acts 1853-1854, ch. 49, §§ 5, 6); § 2546 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 141, § 6); §§ 3323-3339, §§ 3716-3719 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 57, §§ 1, 4), § 4053 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 156, § 4), § 4055; Acts 1871, ch. 113, § 1; 1887, ch. 245, § 1; Acts 1895, ch. 34, §§ 1-3; 1897, ch. 97; 1901, ch. 146, §§ 1, 2; 1915, ch. 143, § 1; 1919, ch. 148, § 1; Shan., §§ 4272-4278, 4280, 4281a1, 4281a2, 4282-4289, 4291-4303, 4303 a1, 4304-4320, 5072-5088, 5486-5490, 5868. 5870; Shan. Supp., § 4301a1; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8088, 8489-8496, 8498, 8499, 8501-8540, 9227-9243, 9647-9651, 10069, 10071; Acts 1951, ch. 24, §§ 1-4 (Williams, §§ 9395.1-9395.4); 1968, ch. 506, § 1; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 34-401 — 34-410, 34-412 — 34-422, 34-1101 — 34-1104; Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 31; 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning management of estate generally, were repealed by Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 40, effective January 1, 1993.

Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 51 provided that nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize a corporation, partnership, association, or other business entity to be appointed as a fiduciary unless such corporation, partnership, association or other business entity is otherwise authorized by law to exercise such authority.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 52 provided that for each existing guardian or conservator, the provisions of this chapter shall be effective for any act required to be done by the fiduciary and due on or after January 1, 1993; and that each existing limited guardian shall become a guardian or conservator as the case may be, with limited powers on January 1, 1993.

Law Reviews.

Changes in Tennessee's Guardianship and Conservatorship Statute (Mary D. Colley and Colleen P. Mac Lean), 29 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 14 (1993).

Conservatorship Proceedings and Due Process: Protecting the Elderly in Tennessee (Tricia M. York), 36 U. Mem. L. Rev. 491 (2006).

Survey of the New Tennessee Guardianship and Conservatorship Act, 60 Tenn. L. Rev. (1993).

To Be or Not To Be in Tennessee: Deciding Surrogate Issues, 34 U. Mem. L. Rev. 333 (2004).

34-3-102. Petition for appointment of conservator — Who may file.

A petition for the appointment of a conservator may be filed by any person having knowledge of the circumstances necessitating the appointment of a conservator.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 42; T.C.A. 34-13-102.

34-3-103. Priority of persons to be considered for appointment.

Subject to the court's determination of what is in the best interests of the person with a disability, the court shall consider the following persons in the order listed for appointment of the conservator:

The person or persons designated in a writing signed by the alleged person with a disability;

The spouse of the person with a disability;

Any child of the person with a disability;

Closest relative or relatives of the person with a disability;

A district public guardian as described by § 34-7-104; and

Other person or persons.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 43; T.C.A. §34-13-103; Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 36.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

34-3-104. Petition for appointment — Sworn — Contents.

The petition for the appointment of a conservator, which shall be sworn, should contain the following:

The name, date of birth, residence and mailing address of the respondent;

A description of the nature of the alleged disability of the respondent;

The name, age, residence and mailing address of the petitioner, a statement of the relationship of the petitioner to the respondent, and a statement of any felony or misdemeanor convictions of the petitioner, if any;

The name, age, mailing address, relationship of the proposed conservator and a statement of any felony or misdemeanor conviction of the proposed conservator and, if the proposed conservator is not the petitioner, a statement signed by the proposed conservator acknowledging awareness of the petition and a willingness to serve;

The name, mailing address and relationship of the closest relative or relatives of the respondent and the name and mailing address of the person or institution, if any, having care and custody of the respondent or with whom the respondent is living. If the respondent has no then living spouse, child, parent or sibling, the petition shall so state and more remote relatives are not to be listed;

A summary of the facts supporting the petitioner's allegation that a conservator is needed;

The name of the respondent’s physician or, where appropriate, respondent’s psychologist or senior psychological examiner and either:

A sworn examination report described in § 34-3-105(c);

A statement that the respondent has been examined but the sworn examination report has not been received but will be filed before the hearing; or

A statement that the respondent refuses to be examined voluntarily, with a request that the court direct the respondent to submit to medical examination;

The rights of the respondent to be removed from the respondent and transferred to the conservator. The rights the court may remove may include, but are not limited to, the right to vote, dispose of property, execute instruments, make purchases, enter into contractual relationships, hold a valid Tennessee driver license, give or refuse consent to medical and mental examinations and treatment or hospitalization, or do any other act of legal significance the court deems necessary or advisable;

If the petition requests the conservator to manage the property of the respondent, the petition also shall contain:

If the financial information about the respondent is known to the petitioner:

A list of the property of the respondent, together with the approximate fair market value of each item and a statement whether the property listed is all of the respondent's property;

A list of the source, amount and frequency of each item of income, pension, social security benefit or other revenue received by the respondent;

A list of the usual monthly expenses of the respondent and an explanation of how these expenditures were met prior to the filing of the petition;

A description of the proposed plan for the management of the respondent's property if a conservator is appointed; or

If the financial information about the respondent is unknown to the petitioner, a request that the court enter an order authorizing the petitioner to investigate the respondent's property; and

A request for a guardian ad litem, conservator or co-conservator, or attorney ad litem with specific experience or expertise in matters like those faced by the respondent, if warranted under the circumstances.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 44; 1994, ch. 855, § 14; T.C.A. §34-13-104; Acts 2003, ch. 124, § 1; 2012, ch. 807, § 1; 2012, ch. 917, § 2; 2013, ch. 435, §§ 25, 26.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

34-3-105. Examination, physical, psychological or otherwise, of respondent.

If the respondent has been examined by a physician or, where appropriate, a psychologist or senior psychological examiner not more than ninety (90) days prior to the filing of the petition and the examination is pertinent, the report of the examination shall be submitted with the petition. If the respondent has not been examined within ninety (90) days of the filing of the petition, cannot get out to be examined or refuses to be voluntarily examined, the court shall order the respondent to submit to examination by a physician or, where appropriate, a psychologist or senior psychological examiner identified in the petition as the respondent's physician, psychologist or senior psychological examiner or, if the respondent has no physician, psychologist or senior psychological examiner, a physician, psychologist or senior psychological examiner selected by the court. The physician, psychologist or senior psychological examiner, on completing the examination, shall send a sworn written report to the court with copies to the petitioner and the guardian ad litem. The physician's, psychologist's or senior psychological examiner's report shall be made a part of the court record.

On motion by the petitioner, the respondent, the adversary counsel, the guardian ad litem, or on its own initiative, the court may order the respondent to submit to examination by such physicians, psychologists, senior psychological examiners or other specialists who have expertise in the specific disability of the respondent. The examiner shall send a sworn written report to the court with copies to the petitioner, the guardian ad litem and the person requesting the second examination. The court may assess the cost of the second examination against the property of the person with a disability or against the person requesting the examination.

Each physician's, psychologist's or senior psychological examiner's sworn report shall contain the following:

The respondent's medical history; provided, that this subdivision (c)(1) shall not be construed to expand the examiner's scope of practice;

A description of the nature and type of the respondent's disability;

An opinion as to whether a conservator is needed and the type and scope of the conservator with specific statement of the reasons for the recommendation of conservatorship; and

Any other matters as the court deems necessary or advisable.

The examiner's sworn report shall be prima facie evidence of the respondent's disability and need for the appointment of a fiduciary unless the report is contested and found to be in error.

If upon an additional finding that the person with a disability poses a threat to self or others in accordance with the mental health law, title 33, a court of competent jurisdiction may order a commitment to involuntary care and treatment.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 45; T.C.A. §34-13-105; Acts 2012, ch. 807, § 2; 2013, ch. 435, §§ 27, 46.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

34-3-106. Rights of respondent.

The respondent has the right to:

On demand by respondent or the guardian ad litem, a hearing on the issue of disability;

Present evidence, including testimony or other evidence from a physician, psychologist or senior psychological examiner of the respondent's choosing, and confront, as a cross-examiner, witnesses;

Appeal the final decision on the petition with the assistance of an attorney ad litem or adversary counsel;

Attend any hearing;

Have an attorney ad litem appointed to advocate the interests of the respondent; and

Request a protective order placing under seal the respondent's health and financial information, including reports provided under § 34-3-105(c).

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 46; 1996, ch. 1015, § 2; T.C.A. §34-13-106; Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 28; 2014, ch. 799, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

Law Reviews.

A Quantum Leap for Ethical Guidance: Comparison of the Model Code and Rule 1.14 of the Proposed Rules of Professional Conduct (Donna S. Harkness), 35 No. 11 Tenn. B.J. 20 (1999).

34-3-107. Where conservator needed — Court order — Consent.

If the court determines a conservator is needed, the court shall enter an order which shall:

Name the conservator or co-conservators and, in the court's discretion, a standby conservator or co-conservators;

Enumerate the powers removed from the respondent and those to be vested in the conservator. To the extent not specifically removed, the respondent shall retain and shall exercise all of the powers of a person without a disability. The court may consider removing any rights of the person with a disability and vesting some or all in a conservator. Such rights may include, but are not limited to:

The right to give, withhold, or withdraw consent and make other informed decisions relative to medical and mental examinations and treatment;

The right to make end of life decisions:

To consent, withhold, or withdraw consent for the entry of a “do not resuscitate” order or the application of any heroic measures or medical procedures intended solely to sustain life and other medications; and

To consent or withhold consent concerning the withholding or withdrawal of artificially provided food, water, or other nourishment or fluids;

The right to consent to admission to hospitalization, and to be discharged or transferred to a residential setting, group home, or other facility for additional care and treatment;

The right to consent to participate in activities and therapies which are reasonable and necessary for the habilitation of the respondent;

The right to consent or withhold consent to any residential or custodial placement;

The power to give, receive, release, or authorize disclosures of confidential information;

The right to apply for benefits, public and private, for which the person with a disability may be eligible;

The right to dispose of personal property and real property subject to statutory and judicial constraints;

The right to determine whether or not the respondent may utilize a Tennessee driver license for the purpose of driving;

The right to make purchases;

The right to enter into contractual relationships;

The right to execute instruments of legal significance;

The right to pay the respondent's bills and protect and invest the respondent's income and assets;

The right to prosecute and defend lawsuits;

The right to execute, on behalf of the respondent, any and all documents to carry out the authority vested above; and

The right to communication, visitation, or interaction with other persons, including the right to receive visitors, telephone calls, or personal mail;

If the rights and powers transferred to the conservator include management of the respondent's property, the order shall:

Set the amount of the conservator's bond unless waived as authorized in § 34-1-105;

Set the nature and frequency of each approved expenditure and prohibit the conservator from making other expenditures without court approval;

Set forth the approved management of the property of the person with a disability; and

Prohibit the sale of any property except as permitted by § 34-1-116(b) without prior court approval or as permitted in the property management plan approved by the order; and

Whether a conservator is being appointed from § 34-3-103(6), and if the conservator is being appointed from § 34-3-103(6), the reasons why the court was unable to appoint a conservator from § 34-3-103(1)-(5);

State any other authority or direction as the court determines is appropriate to properly care for the person or property of the person with a disability.

If the court grants a protective order placing under seal the respondent's financial information, as provided by § 34-3-106(6), the order shall not deny access to information regarding fees and expenses of the conservatorship.

If a respondent is unable to express consent to communication, visitation, or interaction with a person due to a physical or mental condition, then consent of the respondent may be presumed based on the respondent's prior relationship history with the person.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 47; T.C.A. §34-13-107; Acts 2013, ch. 435, §§ 29, 30, 37, 43, 46; 2014, ch. 799, § 2; 2016, ch. 1062, §§ 2, 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 1062, § 1, as amended by Acts 2017, ch. 24, § 1, provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Falk Act.”

Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added (a)(2)(P) and (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1062, § 5. May 16, 2016.

34-3-108. Discharge of conservator — Modification of duties — Termination — Final accountings and distribution of assets.

A conservator appointed under this chapter may be discharged or have its duties modified if the court determines that the respondent is no longer a person with a disability, or that it is in the best interests of the person with a disability that the conservatorship be terminated, or that the conservator has failed to perform its duties and obligations in accordance with the law, or that the conservator has failed to act in the best interest of the person with a disability so as to warrant modification or termination. The person with a disability or any interested person on the behalf of the person with a disability may petition the court at any time for a termination or modification order under this section.

A petition under subsection (a), if made by the person with a disability, may be communicated to the court by any means including oral communication or informal letter.

The court, upon receipt of the petition filed under this section, shall conduct a hearing. At the hearing, the person with a disability has all the rights set out in § 34-3-106. Prior to the holding of the hearing, the court may require that the person with a disability submit to an examination as required by § 34-3-105 to support the person with a disability's contention that a conservator is no longer needed.

Upon conclusion of the hearing, the court shall enter an order setting forth the court's findings of fact and may do any of the following:

Dismiss the petition;

Remove the conservator and dissolve the original order;

Remove the conservator and appoint a successor;

Modify the original order; or

Grant any other relief the court considers appropriate and in the best interest of the person with a disability.

When the person with a disability dies or the court earlier determines a conservator is no longer needed and issues an order terminating the conservatorship, the conservatorship shall terminate. If the conservator has responsibility for the property of the person with a disability, within one hundred twenty (120) days after the date the conservatorship terminates, the conservator shall file a preliminary final accounting with the court, which shall account for all assets, receipts, and disbursements from the date of the last accounting until the date the conservatorship terminates, and shall detail the amount of the final distribution to close the conservatorship. If no objections have been filed to the clerk's report on the preliminary final accounting within thirty (30) days from the date the clerk's report is filed, the conservator shall distribute the remaining assets. The receipts and final cancelled checks evidencing the final distributions shall be filed with the court by the conservator. When the evidence of the final distribution is filed with the court and on order of the court, the conservatorship proceeding shall be closed.

Any person listed in § 34-3-103(1)-(4) may petition the court to require the conservator to grant any of the rights provided in § 34-3-107(a)(2)(P). The prevailing party in a petition under this subsection (f) shall be entitled to court costs and reasonable attorney fees.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 48; 1994, ch. 855, § 15; 1996, ch. 880, § 1; T.C.A. §34-13-108; Acts 2013, ch. 435, §§ 31, 32, 44, 46; 2016, ch. 1062, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 1062, § 1, as amended by Acts 2017, ch. 24, § 1, provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Falk Act.”

Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added (f).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1062, § 5. May 16, 2016.

34-3-109. Support of person with a disability's spouse or minor children.

The appointment of a conservator for a person with a disability does not automatically terminate the duty of the person with a disability to support such spouse or dependent minor children of the person with a disability. The court having jurisdiction over the person with a disability may establish the amount of financial support to which the spouse or dependent minor children are entitled.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 49; T.C.A. §34-13-109; Acts 2013, ch. 435, §§ 45, 46.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.